Missouri, session 2026, HB2092.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 1.355, to read as follows:
1.355. 1. On November 1, 2026, the state of Missouri shall set clocks back to
2 standard time. Following this changing of the clocks, the state of Missouri shall not
3 participate in daylight saving time thereafter.
4 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary,
5 if the federal government adopts daylight saving time as the new standard time, the
6 state of Missouri shall set clocks to conform with the new standard time.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.